North Dakota statutes. TITLE 17 Energy
CHAPTER 17-01 25X’25 Initiative

17-01-01.
Low-emission technology.

The legislative assembly adopts the low-emission technology initiative with the goal that the agricultural, forestry, natural resources, and working land of the United States should provide energy from low-emission technology and continue to produce safe, abundant, and affordable food, fuel, feed, and fiber. Increasing America’s low-emission technology use will bring new advancements to market and save consumers money, reduce the nation’s dependence on oil from the Middle East, create good new jobs in rural America, clean up the air, reduce urban smog, and address global warming issues. As used in this initiative, low-emission technology includes biofuels, solar, wind, hydropower, geothermal, carbon recycling, carbon sequestration, use of waste heat, recycling, hydrogen, coal, oil, natural gas, and energy efficiency initiatives. Investing and acknowledging a commitment to low-emission technology allows the state to use its abundant natural resources for the benefit of current and future generations. This initiative provides North Dakota consumers with affordable, reliable, resilient, and sustainable energy for the benefit of the state’s economy and communities.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 204, § 1; 2021, ch. 448, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Law Reviews.

North Dakota Law Review: Energy Symposium: Article: Rethinking A Twenty-First Century Model For Energy Development, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 691 (2011).